Utah statutes.
78A-6-207.   Volunteers.

The names of volunteers serving under Section 78A-6-902 shall be stated in the court records of the cases they work with.  Volunteers of record with the court are considered to be volunteers to the juvenile court and are volunteers under Title 67, Chapter 20, Volunteer Government Workers Act.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

